output/hyph-id.level4.pat.txt
ser4o
serta3
se3rur
sesak3
ses3k
set4a
setop3
se4tup
se3un
seve3
2s1f
s3fa
s3fi1
s3fr
2s3g2
2s1h
s2ha.
s3haf
1shal
s2har
s3hi
s2ho
1si
3sia
sia3m
sia3ni
3sib
sib3an
sibi3r
3sid
sido3
sidu3
sie4
si2et
3sif
si4fis
si3fl
si3gr
siha2
sika3
sikat4
si4kl
si3k4r
si3li
si3mi
3sin.
2sinf
2sinh
si4ni.
sinom3
2s1ins
2sinv
sip1l
sipo4
sira4s
sirik3
s2is
sisip3
sis3is
4sism
3s2it
sit3r
siu3m2
2s3j
sje3
sjo3
2s1k4
s3ka
ska2s
s3kl
s3kon
s2kop
3skop.
s4kor
skor3a
skors3
skos3a
s3kt
2s1l2
sla2g
s3las
sle3ma
slite3
s3lo
s3lu
2s3m2
sma3
sman2
sme3r
smig3
smi3t
smo4p3l
2s1n
s3na
s3ng
s3ni
sno2b1
1so
3so.
soa3g
3sob
3sof
sogo3l
soh3an
so3hi
so2ka
so3ki
so1kl
3sol
solo3
solok4
3som
so3ma
so3n2a
s1ops
sorak3
sorog3
so3sa
so4s3ek
so3sf
so3sk
2s1osm
so4sp
so2ta
so3th
so3ti
2s1p4
s3pan
spar4
3s2pes
spi3r
s3pl
spos3a
spo2t
2s1r
s3ra3m2
s3ran
srek1
s3ria
srima3
sri3p
s3ro
2s1s
2s1t4
3s2tab
s4taf
3staf.
sta3ka
ste3g4
sten3g
ste3ro
ste3ru
4steu
s3ti.
3stilo
sti3p
3s4tire
sto4k
stok3r
4stol
sto2p
s3tor
stor4a
stos3t
s3tr
4strua
s3tu
3s4tud
stu3g
stu3p
s3ty
1su
sua3s
su3ba
su4bak
su4b3ar
su2be
su2b1i
su4bun
s3udas
su3i
su4las
sumer3
su3ngi
su3ni
sup3l
su4pr
su3ra
sura3h
sur2d
surd3a
su3su
susu3h4
s3utam
su2ti
sut4r
su3tri
2s3v
2s1w
swa3i
s2wal
s2was
4swa3t
1sy
2sy.
3sya
sya3i
sya3ma
s1yan
sye2n3
3syi
syi2k
2syk
2syr
2syt
3syu
syu3t
3ta.
3t2aa
1tab
taba3n
4tabr
3tac
3tad
tad3an
3tae
3taf
2taf.
3tagl
ta3gra
3tah
3ta2i3
ta3ib
ta3ici
ta3id
ta3il
ta3ine
taing4
ta3ir.
1taj
tajab3
3t2a2k
tak3ad
tak3a3m
tak3en
taki4k
ta3kis
tak3l
ta4kun
3tal
talah4
3tam
t3ampe
tamu2
3tana
tanak3
ta4nan
3t2ane
3tang
3tani
3tanj
3tank
3tano
3tanr
3tanu
3tany
ta2or
3tap
ta3p4lu
3tar
ta4ral
ta4ri.
tar3ut
3tas
tasas3
ta4s3at
tas4t
ta3sta
1ta3t
tata4k3
tata3s
ta4ti.
tat4r
3ta2u
tau3l2
tau3m2
ta3ut.
3tav
3taw
t1awu
tayub3
4t3b4
2t1c
tca1
2t1d
tde1n
1te
te3b4
tegak3
teg3r
te2ha
te3hi
t2ek
teker3
te3kis
tek1l
t2el
teles4
te4li.
telor3
telu3k
tembu4
temu3k
te4n3en
tengi4
te3ngo
te4ni.
3teo
teok1
tep3r
tepuk3
te2ra
ter3ac
te4ran
terap4
tera3t
3tere
ter3ej
terek4
te3rib
te3rip
tero4i
te3rom
te3rop
te2ru
ter3uj
teru3k
ter3ul
te3rum
te3rus
3tes
4teso
3tet
teto3
3teu
te2uk
teu4r
te4uri
2t3f
4t3g
2t2h2
t1ha
tha3i
t3he1
3thu
1ti
3tia
tian3i
tia3t
3tib
tid4
3tif
ti3gr
tiha3t
3tik
ti4kan
ti3kha
tik3is
ti3k2l
tik4r
3til.
til2i
ti4mi.
ti4min
t3imu3t
3tin.
3tina
t1inc
t2ing
ting3u
tip3an
ti3pr
ti3p4s
3tir
t2is
3tis.
tisan3
tisi4k3
tisi3p
ti3sko
2tism
tiso4
tisok3
tis2p
ti3spa
tit2
ti3ta
ti3tro
3tiu
2t1j
tje1
4t3k
tka3
tkam2
tke2n
4t1l
t3la
tla2k1
4t3m2
tmos3
4t3n2
tng2
tno3
tnya2
1t2o
3to.
to4al
to4ang
3tod
to2ka
toka3l
to3ki
to3kl
3tokr
tome3r
3tomi
3ton
to4ni.
toni3t
3tos
to3sko
tot2
totem3
4t3p
tpo3l
2t2r2
t4rad
t4rag
3traga
3t4rai
3t4ram
t4ran
t4ray
4tre
t4ren
t4ret1
t4riaa
t3rid
3t4rij
3t4risa
triti3
tro3b
tro3g
t4rome
tro4p3l
tro3st
4truk
3t4rus
4t1s2
t3sa
tsa1n
t3sl
tso2
t2su3k
2t1t
tta3k
t3th
ttimu3
1tu
3tu.
tu4ak.
tua3r
tu4at
t1uge
tuju3
tu3k4r
3tul
tula4r
tu3lis
3tum
tu2ma
tu2ng3
tuo2r
tu2pi
tu4sa
tu2ti
2t1v
tva1
2t1w
2t1y
4t3z
u3a
u4aa
uam4b
uang3
ua2ni
ua2p1
4uap.
ua2r1u
u4asis
u4ate
uatu3
u4a1u
u1b
uba1i
4ubak
ub3aku
4ubal
ubal3u
4ubang
uba3u
ube2
ubek1
ubel3u
ub1en
ube3ri
ub3h
ubin3a
ub1l
ub3li
u2b1o
ub3op
ub3or
ub3r
ubrak4
3ubu2b1
ubuk1
ub3uni
uburu3
u3c
uca2
3ucap
uce4
ucek1
3uceku
ucu2
u1d
2uda
uda2k
4udap
3udek
u2d1h
u3di
2udos
3udosk
ud3r
uduk1
udu2l
udu2r
udus4a
u1e
u3ed
u2ef
u3el
uelu3
uen1
u1f
ufe3
u2f1l
u2f3r
u1g
ugal1
uga4ri
uge2m
u3gi
u2gl
u2g4r
ugu4
ugu2r
u3ha.
u3har
uh1em
2uhi
uhi2d
uhid3a
1uhj
u1ho
uhu2d
u1i
u2ia
u3id
u2ie
u3i3f
u3i4k
3uik3u
u3il.
ui2r1
ui3ri
u3ise
3ui2su
uita3r
u1j
uja3k
uja4n
uju2
ujud1
4ujut4
2uka
u3kac
u3kaj
u3kak
u3ka3m
u2kan
u3kany
u3kas
u3kau
uka3ud
uk1aw
2uke
uke3t
u1kha
u3kin
1uki2r
u3kis
uk3l
uko3s
uk3ra
uk3re
uk3ro
2uk3s4
uku2e
uku3k
uku2l
uku2m
uk3und
u1l
ulah4
ulai3
u2laj
ula4k
ulak3u
ula2n
ulang3
u3las
u3le4
ulek1
ulem3
ulen3
uler3
ul2i
uli3ni
ulio3
ulis3a
uli4t
3ulitu
u2liz
ul3iza
u2l1ov
u3lu2
uluh1
ulul1
ul3umb
ulung3
uma4m
uma3ni
uma3r
uma4ri
uma3t4r
u3may
4umbah
umbu4
umbuk3
umene3
umi3l
u3mi4s
umpak3
3umpam
umu2d
3umum
umu2r
umu2t
u4nab
una3g
unai3
un3alu
un1an
u2n1ay
unca4
uncu2
4undai
unda4k
undi4k
undu4
3unduh
unduk3
undut4
u3ne
une4k3
ung1
u3ngab
u3ngak
u3ngal
u3ngas
ung4i3
u3ngo
u1ngu
u2ni.
un3iah
1unif
u3nis
uno3
2unom
unos4
unti2
untik3
3until
untu4
u4nub
un3ubu
u4num
un3umb
u3ny
unyam3
u1o
uo3dr
uos4
u1p
3upac
u3pad
3upah
upa3k
3upam3
u2p1an
3upay
u3pe2
uper3a
upet1
2upi
u2pi.
u3pi2n
u3pir
up1l
up2le
up4li
u3plin
u3po
u2p3r
up4ran
upre3
up4ro
up3s
upuk3a
u1q
u2ra
2u3ra.
u3raa
u3rab
u3rac
u3rae
u3raf
u3rag
u3raj
u3rak
u3ral
u3ram
u4r1an
u3ranc
u3rant
u3rap
ura4pi
u3r2as
u3rat
urato4
ura3ur
2u3ray
u3re
2urea3
uret4
uri3b
u3rin
uri3p
3urisu
uro3b
uro4k
urok3r
uro3p
uro4p3l
uro3r
uro3s
uru2
2u3ru.
u3rua
uruk1
u2r1ul
ur3umb
uru4p1
u3rus1
3urusi
urut1
u2sa
3usai
2usal
us1an
3usang
3usap
usa4r
1usea
use4l
2usen
use4r3
us2h
u3shal
u3sho
usi2m3
u4s3int
u4sk
us3ko
u1skr
uso3
usok2
u4st
usu2
4usuk1
4usut
2usy
u4tah.
uta3ka
uta3ki
utame3
ut1an
2ute
utebu3
u2t1em
4utero
ut3h
u2ti.
u3ti3l2
u2tim
utip1
2uto
uto3s
ut3ra
ut3re
ut3rig
u4tro
ut3ru
utua3
utual4
utus1
u3u
uu1h2
uu1n
u1v
uvi3
u3w
uwa3n
uwi4r
2uwo
u3y
uyu2
uyub1
u1z
uza3
3va
va1i
va3la
vano3
va3t
v1b
v1d
ve3h
ve2i3
ven2a
3ver
ve2ra
ve3ran
vete3
veter4
v1g
vi4an
vi3f
vi1h
vio3s
visin3
2vl
v1la
v1li
2v1n
vo3l2a
vo3p
2v1r
2v3s4
2v1t
vu3k
1wa
4waai
wab3an
wa2bi
wada3s
wa3dy
wa2e
wag4
wa3gr
wa2i
wa3idu
wai3t
waki2
wa3kr
wa4l3af
wale3n
wa3li
walot3
wa2ma
wa2n
wa3ngi
wa3ngu
wa3p
wapa1
wari4s
was3aw
wasi4t
wa3s2r
was3w
wata4k
wa4taw
wa3ti
wa1u
weduk3
3wen
wes1a
we2t
wet1a
wi1h
wi3k4
wila3h4
1wi2n
win1i
wipe3
wiper4
wi3ra
wiri2
wit2
witi2
witis3
wo2i
wok2
wo3la
wo3n2a
wo3ni
wori4
2w1r
2w1t
3wu
wu3d
4wuf
wu3h2
wujud3
wu2ka
wu3l2
wulu3s4
wu3na
wung4a
wur1a
wu2ri
wu3s
wu4ta
wuyu3
2w1y
xi3l2
x1p
yada2
ya3g4
yah3an
ya3hub
yahut3
ya3ira
ya3i3t2
yak3ay
yaki2
ya4ko
ya3li
yalib3
yalin4
yam2a
yama3h4
yama4k
yami2
yamik3
yampe4
ya2pa
ya3pad
yapa3t
ya2pi
yapu3k
yas2
ya3sa
yas4t
yata3
yatro4
yatu3k
ya1uh
ya3u4k1
ya1ul
ya1up
yau2r
yawer3
y1b
2y3c
y1d
yeba4
yebab3
yega2
ye3ka
yemu3k
yenda4
ye3ngi
ye3ngu
yente4
ye3ra
yerbe4
ye3r2e4
yerta3
yeru3k
yesa2
ye3t4a
yetop3
yet4ru
ye2u4
yeur1
y1f
2y1g
y1h
yi3f
yika2
yiku3
yi3l
yilu3
yina2
yipa4
yira2
yiri2
yirik3
yisi2
yisip3
2y1j
y1k
2y1l
y2o
yo3ha
yo2ka
yo2m
yong1
yopa2
yopi2
yo4sp
yo2t1
y1r
2y1s
y1t
yua3s
yu3hu
yu3ka
yuku2
yu3l
yula3k
yu2m4a
yu2mi
yung4a
yun4k
yusu3k4
yut1
yu2ti
yut4r
1yuz
2y1w
2y1y
za4a
za1h
za2i
za3im
zali2
zalim3
zam2a
za3ti
2z1b
2z1d
1ze
ze3i
ze3k
2z1h
zi3b
zim3an
zio4
zi3p
2z1k
z1l
zlo3
2z1m
2z1n
zoe3
zo3ha
zo3i
zono3
zo3o
zos3f
2z1t
zu1h
zu3k
zu3n
zu3r
2z1y
2z1z
ê1d
ê1n
ê3r
êra1
